Florida, session 2026, HB1279.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
148
149 Section 1. Section 413.0114, Florida Statutes, is created
150 to read:
Page 6 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
151 413.0114 Consumer disclosure for blind-related services.—
152 (1) An individual, a business, a nonprofit, or other
153 entity offering fee-based services to individuals who are blind
154 or visually impaired shall, before entering into a contract or
155 accepting payment, disclose in writing whether equivalent or
156 substantially similar services may be available at no cost
157 through the Division of Blind Services or another public agency.
158 (2) The written disclosure must:
159 (a) Be provided in plain language and, upon request, in an
160 accessible format, such as braille, large print, or audio.
161 (b) Include contact information for the Division of Blind
162 Services.
163 (c) Be signed or electronically acknowledged by the
164 consumer or his or her representative.
165 (3) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or
166 deceptive trade practice under part II of chapter 501 and is
167 subject to penalties and enforcement as provided therein.
168 (4) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
169 implement this section.
170 Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 413.208, Florida
171 Statutes, is amended to read:
172 413.208 Service providers; quality assurance; fitness for
173 responsibilities; background screening.—
174 (1) Service providers must apply to register with the
175 division. To qualify for approval, a registration, the division
Page 7 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
176 must ensure that the service provider must maintain maintains an
177 internal system of quality assurance, have has proven functional
178 systems, meet the minimum qualifications, and be is subject to a
179 due-diligence inquiry as to its fitness to undertake service
180 responsibilities.
181 (a) The division shall establish minimum qualifications
182 for service providers. The division shall establish an annual
183 application period for service providers to submit applications.
184 The division may approve or deny any service provider
185 application. Beginning January 1, 2027, only service providers
186 that meet the minimum qualifications established by the division
187 and that have been approved to provide employment-related
188 services to individuals with disabilities may participate in the
189 vocational rehabilitation program.
190 (b) The division shall develop and make publicly available
191 an annual report of service provider effectiveness, which
192 includes an evaluation system measuring the effectiveness of all
193 service providers that are approved by the division to provide
194 employment-related services to individuals with disabilities.
195 (c) In order to maintain approved status with the
196 division, service providers must meet minimum standards of
197 effectiveness in the provision of vocational rehabilitation
198 services, including placement of individuals in competitive and
199 integrated employment.
200 (d) Rates for vocational rehabilitation services must be
Page 8 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
201 allocable, reasonable, and necessary, as determined by the
202 division.
203 Section 3. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
204 491.005, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
205 491.005 Licensure by examination.—
206 (3) MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY.—Upon verification of
207 documentation and payment of a fee not to exceed $200, as set by
208 board rule, the department shall issue a license as a marriage
209 and family therapist to an applicant whom the board certifies
210 has met all of the following criteria:
211 (c)1. Attained one of the following:
212 a. A minimum of a master's degree in marriage and family
213 therapy from a program accredited by the Commission on
214 Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education.
215 b. A minimum of a master's degree with a major emphasis in
216 marriage and family therapy or a closely related field from a
217 university program accredited by the Council on Accreditation of
218 Counseling and Related Educational Programs and graduate courses
219 approved by the board.
220 c. A minimum of a master's degree with an emphasis in
221 marriage and family therapy or a closely related field, with a
222 degree conferred before September 1, 2032 2027, from an
223 institutionally accredited college or university and graduate
224 courses approved by the board.
225 2. If the course title that appears on the applicant's
Page 9 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
226 transcript does not clearly identify the content of the
227 coursework, the applicant provided additional documentation,
228 including, but not limited to, a syllabus or catalog description
229 published for the course. The required master's degree must have
230 been received in an institution of higher education that, at the
231 time the applicant graduated, was fully accredited by an
232 institutional accrediting body recognized by the Council for
233 Higher Education Accreditation or its successor organization or
234 was a member in good standing with Universities Canada, or an
235 institution of higher education located outside the United
236 States and Canada which, at the time the applicant was enrolled
237 and at the time the applicant graduated, maintained a standard
238 of training substantially equivalent to the standards of
239 training of those institutions in the United States which are
240 accredited by an institutional accrediting body recognized by
241 the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor
242 organization. Such foreign education and training must have been
243 received in an institution or program of higher education
244 officially recognized by the government of the country in which
245 it is located as an institution or program to train students to
246 practice as professional marriage and family therapists or
247 psychotherapists. The applicant has the burden of establishing
248 that the requirements of this provision have been met, and the
249 board shall require documentation, such as an evaluation by a
250 foreign equivalency determination service, as evidence that the
Page 10 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
251 applicant's graduate degree program and education were
252 equivalent to an accredited program in this country. An
253 applicant with a master's degree from a program that did not
254 emphasize marriage and family therapy may complete the
255 coursework requirement in a training institution fully
256 accredited by the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and
257 Family Therapy Education recognized by the United States
258 Department of Education.
259
260 For the purposes of dual licensure, the department shall license
261 as a marriage and family therapist any person who meets the
262 requirements of s. 491.0057. Fees for dual licensure may not
263 exceed those stated in this subsection.
264 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (17) and
265 subsections (21) and (23) of section 1001.42, Florida Statutes,
266 are amended to read:
267 1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
268 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
269 powers and perform all duties listed below:
270 (17) PUBLIC INFORMATION AND PARENTAL INVOLVEMENT PROGRAM.—
271 (a) Adopt procedures whereby the general public can be
272 adequately informed of the educational programs, needs, and
273 objectives of public education within the district, including
274 educational opportunities available through approved virtual
275 instruction program providers under s. 1002.45 or the school
Page 11 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
276 district's virtual instruction program the Florida Virtual
277 School.
278 (21) EDUCATIONAL EMERGENCY.—To free schools that have with
279 a school grade of "D" or "F" or are persistently low-performing
280 schools as described in s. 1002.333 from contract restrictions
281 that limit the school district's school's ability to implement
282 programs and strategies needed to improve student performance, a
283 district school board may adopt salary incentives or other
284 strategies that address the selection, placement, compensation,
285 and expectations of instructional personnel and provide
286 principals with the autonomy described in s. 1012.28(8). For
287 purposes of this subsection, an educational emergency exists in
288 a school district if one or more schools in the district have a
289 school grade of "D" or "F" or are persistently low-performing
290 schools as described in s. 1002.333. "F." Notwithstanding
291 chapter 447, relating to collective bargaining, a district
292 school board may:
293 (a) Provide salary incentives that differentiate based on
294 a teacher's certification, subject area taught, or grade level
295 taught. Such incentives are not subject to collective bargaining
296 requirements.
297 (b) Notwithstanding s. 1012.2315, relating to assignment
298 of teachers, adopt strategies to assign high-quality teachers
299 more equitably across schools in the district to low-performing
300 schools as a management right. Such strategies are not subject
Page 12 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
301 to collective bargaining requirements.
302 (23) VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION.—Provide students with access to
303 courses, based on the students' choice, available through the
304 school district's a virtual instruction program option or an
305 approved virtual instruction program provider under s. 1002.45,
306 including the Florida Virtual School and other approved
307 providers, and award credit for successful completion of such
308 courses.
309 Section 5. Subsection (1) of section 1001.92, Florida
310 Statutes, is amended to read:
311 1001.92 State University System Performance-Based
312 Incentive.—
313 (1) A State University System Performance-Based Incentive
314 shall be awarded to state universities using performance-based
315 metrics adopted by the Board of Governors of the State
316 University System. Beginning with the Board of Governors'
317 determination of each university's performance improvement and
318 achievement ratings, and the related distribution of annual
319 fiscal year appropriation, the performance-based metrics must
320 include:
321 (a) The 4-year graduation rate and adjusted cohort
322 graduation rate for engineering programs for first-time-in-
323 college students;
324 (b) Beginning in fiscal year 2022-2023, the 3-year
325 graduation rate for associate in arts transfer students;
Page 13 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
326 (c) Retention rates;
327 (d) Postgraduation education rates;
328 (e) Degree production;
329 (f) Affordability;
330 (g) Postgraduation employment and salaries, including wage
331 thresholds that reflect the added value of a baccalaureate
332 degree;
333 (h) Access rate, based on the percentage of first-year
334 undergraduate students enrolled during the fall term who
335 received a Pell Grant during the fall term; and
336 (i) Beginning in fiscal year 2021-2022, the 6-year
337 graduation rate for students who are awarded a Pell Grant in
338 their first year.
339
340 The Board of Governors may approve other metrics in a publicly
341 noticed meeting. The board shall adopt benchmarks to evaluate
342 each state university's performance on the metrics to measure
343 the state university's achievement of institutional excellence
344 or need for improvement and minimum requirements for eligibility
345 to receive performance funding. Benchmarks and metrics may not
346 be adjusted after university performance data has been received
347 by the Board of Governors.
348 Section 6. Paragraph (i) of subsection (3) of section
349 1002.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
350 1002.20 K-12 student and parent rights.—Parents of public
Page 14 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
351 school students must receive accurate and timely information
352 regarding their child's academic progress and must be informed
353 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12
354 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory
355 rights including, but not limited to, the following:
356 (3) HEALTH ISSUES.—
357 (i) Epinephrine use and supply.—
358 1. A student who has experienced or is at risk for life-
359 threatening allergic reactions may carry a United States Food
360 and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved an epinephrine delivery
361 device auto-injector and self-administer epinephrine by such
362 FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector while in school,
363 participating in school-sponsored activities, or in transit to
364 or from school or school-sponsored activities if the school has
365 been provided with parental and physician authorization. The
366 State Board of Education, in cooperation with the Department of
367 Health, shall adopt rules for such use of FDA-approved
368 epinephrine delivery devices which must auto-injectors that
369 shall include provisions to protect the safety of all students
370 from the misuse or abuse of such delivery devices auto-
371 injectors. A school district, county health department, public-
372 private partner, and their employees and volunteers shall be
373 indemnified by the parent of a student authorized to carry an
374 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injector for any
375 and all liability with respect to the student's use of an FDA-
Page 15 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
376 approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injector pursuant to
377 this paragraph.
378 2. A public school may purchase a supply of FDA-approved
379 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale
380 distributor as defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an
381 arrangement with a wholesale distributor or manufacturer as
382 defined in s. 499.003 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery
383 devices auto-injectors at fair-market, free, or reduced prices
384 for use in the event a student has an anaphylactic reaction. The
385 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be
386 maintained in a secure location on the public school's premises.
387 The participating school district shall adopt a protocol
388 developed by a licensed physician for the administration by
389 school personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic
390 reaction and to administer an epinephrine by an FDA-approved
391 delivery device auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved
392 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors may be provided to
393 and used by a student authorized to self-administer epinephrine
394 by FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector under subparagraph
395 1. or trained school personnel.
396 3. The school district and its employees, agents, and the
397 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA-
398 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not
399 liable for any injury arising from the use of such an
400 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by
Page 16 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
401 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and
402 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an
403 anaphylactic reaction:
404 a. Unless the trained school personnel's action is willful
405 and wanton;
406 b. Notwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the
407 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been
408 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging
409 that the school district is not liable; and
410 c. Regardless of whether authorization has been given by
411 the student's parents or guardians or by the student's
412 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
413 nurse.
414 Section 7. Subsection (17) of section 1002.42, Florida
415 Statutes, is amended to read:
416 1002.42 Private schools.—
417 (17) EPINEPHRINE SUPPLY.—
418 (a) A private school may purchase a supply of United
419 States Food and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved epinephrine
420 delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale distributor as
421 defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an arrangement with a
422 wholesale distributor or manufacturer as defined in s. 499.003
423 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors
424 at fair-market, free, or reduced prices for use in the event a
425 student has an anaphylactic reaction. The FDA-approved
Page 17 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
426 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be maintained
427 in a secure location on the private school's premises. The
428 participating private school shall adopt a protocol developed by
429 a licensed physician for the administration by private school
430 personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic reaction
431 and to administer epinephrine by an FDA-approved epinephrine
432 delivery device auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved
433 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors may be provided to
434 and used by a student authorized to self-administer epinephrine
435 by an FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector under s.
436 1002.20(3)(i) or trained school personnel.
437 (b) The private school and its employees, agents, and the
438 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA-
439 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not
440 liable for any injury arising from the use of an FDA-approved
441 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by
442 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and
443 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an
444 anaphylactic reaction:
445 1. Unless the trained school personnel's action is willful
446 and wanton;
447 2. Notwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the
448 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been
449 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging
450 that the school district is not liable; and
Page 18 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
451 3. Regardless of whether authorization has been given by
452 the student's parents or guardians or by the student's
453 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
454 nurse.
455 Section 8. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
456 1002.421, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
457 1002.421 State school choice scholarship program
458 accountability and oversight.—
459 (1) PRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.—A private
460 school participating in an educational scholarship program
461 established pursuant to this chapter must be a private school as
462 defined in s. 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in
463 compliance with all requirements of this section in addition to
464 private school requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific
465 requirements identified within respective scholarship program
466 laws, and other provisions of Florida law that apply to private
467 schools, and must:
468 (i) Maintain a physical location in the state at which
469 each student has regular and direct contact with teachers.
470 Regular and direct contact with teachers may be satisfied for
471 students enrolled in a personalized education program or for
472 students eligible for a scholarship under s. 1002.394(3)(b) if
473 students have regular and direct contact with teachers at the
474 physical location at least 2 school days per week and the
475 student learning plan addresses the remaining instructional
Page 19 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
476 time.
477
478 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private
479 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection, and
480 shall prohibit the school from enrolling new scholarship
481 students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school complies. If a
482 private school fails to meet the requirements of this subsection
483 or has consecutive years of material exceptions listed in the
484 report required under paragraph (q), the commissioner may
485 determine that the private school is ineligible to participate
486 in a scholarship program.
487 Section 9. Subsection (3), paragraph (e) of subsection
488 (4), paragraph (a) of subsection (5), and paragraph (e) of
489 subsection (6) of section 1002.68, Florida Statutes, are amended
490 to read:
491 1002.68 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
492 accountability.—
493 (3)(a) For the 2020-2021 program year, the department
494 shall calculate a kindergarten readiness rate for each private
495 prekindergarten provider and public school participating in the
496 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program based upon learning
497 gains and the percentage of students assessed as ready for
498 kindergarten. The department shall require that each school
499 district administer the statewide kindergarten screening in use
500 before the 2021-2022 school year to each kindergarten student in
Page 20 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
501 the school district within the first 30 school days of the 2021-
502 2022 school year. Private schools may administer the statewide
503 kindergarten screening to each kindergarten student in a private
504 school who was enrolled in the Voluntary Prekindergarten
505 Education Program. Learning gains shall be determined using a
506 value-added measure based on growth demonstrated by the results
507 of the preassessment and postassessment in use before the 2021-
508 2022 program year. However, a provider may not be newly placed
509 on probationary status under this paragraph. A provider
510 currently on probationary status may only be removed from such
511 status if the provider earns the minimum rate, determined
512 pursuant to subsection (5). The methodology for calculating a
513 provider's readiness rate may not include students who are not
514 administered the statewide kindergarten screening.
515 (b) For the 2021-2022 program year, kindergarten screening
516 results may not be used in the calculation of readiness rates.
517 Any private prekindergarten provider or public school
518 participating in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
519 which fails to meet the minimum kindergarten readiness rate for
520 the 2021-2022 program year is subject to the probation
521 requirements of subsection (5).
522 (3)(4)
523 (e) Subject to an appropriation, the department shall
524 provide for a differential payment to a private prekindergarten
525 provider and public school based on the provider's designation.
Page 21 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
526 The maximum differential payment may not exceed a total of 15
527 percent of the base student allocation per full-time equivalent
528 student under s. 1002.71 attending in the consecutive program
529 year for that program. A private prekindergarten provider or
530 public school may not receive a differential payment if it
531 receives a designation of "proficient" or lower. Before the
532 adoption of the methodology, the department shall confer with
533 the Council for Early Grade Success under s. 1008.2125 before
534 receiving approval from the State Board of Education for the
535 final recommendations on the designation system and differential
536 payments.
537 (4)(a)(5)(a) If a public school's or private
538 prekindergarten provider's program assessment composite score
539 for its prekindergarten classrooms fails to meet the minimum
540 program assessment composite score for contracting adopted in
541 rule by the department, the private prekindergarten provider or
542 public school may not participate in the Voluntary
543 Prekindergarten Education Program beginning in the consecutive
544 program year and thereafter until the public school or private
545 prekindergarten provider meets the minimum composite score for
546 contracting. A public school or private prekindergarten provider
547 may request one program assessment per program year in order to
548 requalify for participation in the Voluntary Prekindergarten
549 Education Program, provided that the public school or private
550 prekindergarten provider is not excluded from participation
Page 22 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
551 under ss. 1002.55(6), 1002.61(10)(b), 1002.63(9)(b), or
552 paragraph (b) (5)(b) of this section. If a public school or
553 private prekindergarten provider would like an additional
554 program assessment completed within the same program year, the
555 public school or private prekindergarten provider shall be
556 responsible for the cost of the program assessment.
557 (5)(6)
558 (e) A private prekindergarten provider or public school
559 granted a good cause exemption shall continue to implement its
560 improvement plan and continue the corrective actions required
561 under paragraph (4)(b) (5)(b) until the provider or school meets
562 the minimum performance metric.
563 Section 10. Paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (4) of
564 section 1002.945, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
565 1002.945 Gold Seal Quality Care Program.—
566 (4) In order to obtain and maintain a designation as a
567 Gold Seal Quality Care provider, a child care facility, large
568 family child care home, or family day care home must meet the
569 following additional criteria:
570 (a) The child care provider must not have had any class I
571 violations, as defined by rule of the Department of Children and
572 Families, for which the Department of Children and Families
573 determines that the child care provider is the primary cause of
574 the violation within the 2 years preceding its application for
575 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider. Commission of
Page 23 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
576 a class I violation for which the Department of Children and
577 Families determines that the child care provider is the primary
578 cause of the violation shall be grounds for termination of the
579 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider until the
580 provider has no class I violations for a period of 2 years.
581 (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), if the Department of
582 Education determines through a formal process that a provider
583 has been in business for at least 5 years and has no other class
584 I violations recorded, the department may recommend to the state
585 board that the provider maintain its Gold Seal Quality Care
586 status. The state board's determination regarding such
587 provider's status is final.
588 Section 11. Subsection (2) of section 1003.4203, Florida
589 Statutes, is amended to read:
590 1003.4203 Digital materials, CAPE Digital Tool
591 certificates, CAPE industry certifications, and technical
592 assistance.—
593 (2) CAPE DIGITAL TOOL CERTIFICATES.—The department shall
594 identify, in the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List under
595 ss. 1003.492 and 1008.44, CAPE Digital Tool certificates that
596 indicate a student's digital skills. The department shall notify
597 each school district when the certificates are available. The
598 certificates shall be made available to all public elementary
599 and middle grades students. Targeted skills to be mastered for
600 the certificate include digital skills that are necessary to the
Page 24 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
601 student's academic work and skills the student may need in
602 future employment. CAPE Digital Tool certificates earned by
603 students are eligible for additional funding pursuant to s.
604 1011.62(17). Middle grade students may not earn more than two
605 CAPE Digital Tools certificates per school year.
606 Section 12. Paragraph (f) of subsection (3) and subsection
607 (10) of section 1003.4282, Florida Statutes, are amended to
608 read:
609 1003.4282 Requirements for a standard high school
610 diploma.—
611 (3) STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; COURSE AND ASSESSMENT
612 REQUIREMENTS.—
613 (f) One credit in physical education.—Physical education
614 must include the integration of health. Participation in an
615 interscholastic sport at the junior varsity or varsity level for
616 two full seasons shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in
617 physical education. A district school board may not require that
618 the one credit in physical education be taken during the 9th
619 grade year. Completion of 2 years of marching band shall satisfy
620 the one-credit requirement in physical education and or the one-
621 credit requirement in performing arts. This credit may not be
622 used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the
623 requirement for adaptive physical education under an individual
624 education plan (IEP) or 504 plan. Completion of 1.0 credit with
625 a grade of "C" or better in a dance techniques course, a
Page 25 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
626 significant component of which is activities designed to
627 maintain or improve health-related fitness and lifelong fitness,
628 shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in physical education
629 or the one-credit requirement in performing arts. This credit
630 may not be used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or
631 the requirement for adaptive physical education under an IEP or
632 504 plan. Completion of one semester with a grade of "C" or
633 better in a marching band class, in a physical activity class
634 that requires participation in marching band activities as an
635 extracurricular activity, or in a dance class shall satisfy one-
636 half credit in physical education or one-half credit in
637 performing arts. This credit may not be used to satisfy the
638 personal fitness requirement or the requirement for adaptive
639 physical education under an IEP or 504 plan. Completion of 2
640 years in a Reserve Officer Training Corps (R.O.T.C.) class, a
641 significant component of which is drills, shall satisfy the one-
642 credit requirement in physical education and the one-credit
643 requirement in performing arts. This credit may not be used to
644 satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the requirement for
645 adaptive physical education under an IEP or 504 plan.
646 (10) CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION CREDIT.—The Department
647 of Education shall convene a workgroup, no later than December
648 1, 2024, to:
649 (a) Identify best practices in career and technical
650 education pathways from middle school to high school to aid
Page 26 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
651 middle school students in career planning and facilitate their
652 transition to high school programs. The career pathway must be
653 linked to postsecondary programs.
654 (b) Establish three mathematics pathways for students
655 enrolled in secondary grades by aligning mathematics courses to
656 programs, postsecondary education, and careers. The workgroup
657 shall collaborate to identify the three mathematics pathways and
658 the mathematics course sequence within each pathway that which
659 align to the mathematics skills needed for success in the
660 corresponding academic programs, postsecondary education, and
661 careers.
662 1. The mathematics pathways must be identified no later
663 than September 1, 2026. The Department of Education shall submit
664 identified mathematics pathways to the Governor, the President
665 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
666 2. The mathematics pathways must incorporate an applied
667 algebra course that aligns with established career and technical
668 education career clusters.
669 3. The Department of Education shall develop applied
670 algebra courses aligned with the identified mathematics pathways
671 and the established career and technical education career
672 clusters by January 1, 2027, with availability for district
673 implementation in the 2029-2030 school year.
674 a. The applied algebra for engineering and technology
675 course must incorporate content and contexts that apply to the
Page 27 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
676 following career clusters: energy, engineering and technology
677 education, and information technology.
678 b. The applied algebra for health science course must
679 incorporate content and contexts that apply to the health
680 science career cluster.
681 c. The applied algebra for business and finance course
682 must incorporate content and contexts that apply to the
683 following career clusters: business management and
684 administration; finance; government and public administration;
685 and marketing, sales, and service.
686 d. The applied algebra for industrial pathways course must
687 incorporate content and contexts that apply to the following
688 career clusters: architecture and construction; manufacturing;
689 and transportation, distribution, and logistics.
690 e. The applied algebra for agriculture and natural
691 resources course must incorporate content and contexts that
692 apply to the agriculture, food, and natural resources career
693 cluster.
694 4. Each mathematics pathway must offer flexibility and the
695 ability to move between pathways if necessary.
696 5. Mathematics pathways must create clear links between
697 secondary mathematics and postsecondary mathematics pathways, as
698 established in State Board of Education rule, and support
699 student progression into postsecondary academic programs, state
700 college career and technical education programs, career center
Page 28 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
701 programs, industry certification programs, and high-skill, high-
702 wage occupations.
703 6. Each applied algebra course must prepare students to
704 take the statewide, standardized Algebra I end-of-course
705 assessment required under s. 1008.22.
706 7. Each applied algebra course must meet all requirements
707 for a mathematics credit required for high school graduation
708 under s. 1003.4282(3)(b) or for middle grades promotion pursuant
709 to s. 1003.4156(1)(b).
710 8. The Department of Education shall collaborate with the
711 Board of Governors of the State University System to ensure that
712 each applied algebra course is accepted as a mathematics credit
713 for state university admissions.
714 9. The Department of Education shall provide professional
715 learning, instructional resources, and technical assistance to
716 support district implementation for the 2029-2030 school year.
717 Section 13. Section 1003.437, Florida Statutes, is amended
718 to read:
719 1003.437 Middle and high school grading system.—The
720 grading system and interpretation of letter grades used to
721 measure student success in grade 6 through grade 12 courses for
722 students in public schools shall be as follows:
723 (1) Grade "A" equals 90 percent through 100 percent, has a
724 grade point average value of 4, and is defined as "outstanding
725 progress."
Page 29 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
726 (2) Grade "B" equals 80 percent through 89 percent, has a
727 grade point average value of 3, and is defined as "above average
728 progress."
729 (3) Grade "C" equals 70 percent through 79 percent, has a
730 grade point average value of 2, and is defined as "average
731 progress."
732 (4) Grade "D" equals 60 percent through 69 percent, has a
733 grade point average value of 1, and is defined as "lowest
734 acceptable progress."
735 (5) Grade "F" equals zero percent through 59 percent, has
736 a grade point average value of zero, and is defined as
737 "failure."
738 (6) Grade "I" equals zero percent, has a grade point
739 average value of zero, and is defined as "incomplete."
740
741 The State Board of Education shall establish a statewide uniform
742 weighted grading system for honors courses and articulated
743 acceleration mechanisms identified in s. 1007.27. For the
744 purposes of class ranking, District school boards shall use the
745 may exercise a weighted grading system to calculate weighted
746 high school grade point averages pursuant to s. 1007.271.
747 Section 14. Subsection (5) is added to section 1003.5716,
748 Florida Statutes, to read:
749 1003.5716 Transition to postsecondary education and career
750 opportunities.—All students with disabilities who are 3 years of
Page 30 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
751 age to 21 years of age have the right to a free, appropriate
752 public education. As used in this section, the term "IEP" means
753 individual education plan.
754 (5)
755 (a) If a related service identified in a student's IEP is
756 not provided as scheduled, the school district must notify the
757 parent or guardian in writing or by electronic means within 10
758 school days, explain the reason the service was not provided,
759 and discuss a plan for make-up services.
760 (b) A parent or guardian has the right to access, upon
761 request, all service provider logs or progress notes within 15
762 school days after such service is provided. The school district
763 shall inform parents of this right at each IEP meeting.
764
765 Section 15. Subsections (5) and (6) of section 1004.343,
766 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
767 1004.343 Statewide Data Repository for Anonymous Human
768 Trafficking Data.—
769 (5) Beginning January 31, 2027 July 1, 2025, and annually
770 thereafter, the University of South Florida Trafficking in
771 Persons - Risk to Resilience Lab, in consultation with the
772 Department of Law Enforcement, shall submit an annual report and
773 analysis on its findings to the Governor, the Attorney General,
774 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
775 Representatives.
Page 31 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
776 (6) This section is repealed July 1, 2027 2026, unless
777 reviewed and reenacted by the Legislature before that date.
778 Section 16. Subsections (3), (4), and (5) of section
779 1004.39, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
780 1004.39 College of Law at Florida International
781 University.—
782 (3) The College of Law at Florida International
783 University, to the extent consistent with the standards required
784 by a the American Bar Association or any other nationally
785 recognized association for the accreditation of colleges of law,
786 shall develop a law library collection utilizing electronic
787 formats and mediums.
788 (4) The College of Law at Florida International University
789 shall develop and institute a program that is consistent with
790 sound legal education principles as determined by a the American
791 Bar Association or any other nationally recognized association
792 for the accreditation of colleges of law and that, to the extent
793 consistent with such sound legal education principles, is
794 structured to serve the legal needs of traditionally underserved
795 portions of the population by providing an opportunity for
796 participation in a legal clinic program or pro bono legal
797 service.
798 (5) The Florida International University Board of Trustees
799 and the Board of Governors may accept grants, donations, gifts,
800 and moneys available for this purpose, including moneys for
Page 32 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
801 planning and constructing the college. The Florida International
802 University Board of Trustees may procure and accept any federal
803 funds that are available for the planning, creation, and
804 establishment of the college of law. If a the American Bar
805 Association or any other nationally recognized association for
806 the accreditation of colleges of law issues a third disapproval
807 of an application for provisional approval or for full approval
808 or fails to grant, within 5 years following the graduation of
809 the first class, a provisional approval, to the College of Law
810 at Florida International University, the Board of Governors
811 shall make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature
812 as to whether the college of law will cease operations at the
813 end of the full academic year subsequent to the receipt by the
814 college of law of any such third disapproval, or whether the
815 college of law will continue operations and any conditions for
816 continued operations. If the college of law ceases operations
817 pursuant to this section, the following conditions apply:
818 (a) The authority for the College of Law at Florida
819 International University and the authority of the Florida
820 International University Board of Trustees and the Board of
821 Governors provided in this section shall terminate upon the
822 cessation of operations of the College of Law at Florida
823 International University. The College of Law at Florida
824 International University shall receive no moneys allocated for
825 the planning, construction, or operation of the college of law
Page 33 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
826 after its cessation of operations other than moneys to be
827 expended for the cessation of operations of the college of law.
828 Any moneys allocated to the College of Law at Florida
829 International University not expended prior to or scheduled to
830 be expended after the date of the cessation of the college of
831 law shall be appropriated for other use by the Legislature of
832 the State of Florida.
833 (b) Any buildings of the College of Law at Florida
834 International University constructed from the expenditure of
835 capital outlay funds appropriated by the Legislature shall be
836 owned by the Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust
837 Fund and managed by the Florida International University Board
838 of Trustees upon the cessation of the college of law.
839 Section 17. Subsections (3), (4), and (5) of section
840 1004.40, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
841 1004.40 College of Law at Florida Agricultural and
842 Mechanical University.—
843 (3) The College of Law at Florida Agricultural and
844 Mechanical University, to the extent consistent with the
845 standards required by a the American Bar Association or any
846 other nationally recognized association for the accreditation of
847 colleges of law, shall develop a law library collection
848 utilizing electronic formats and mediums.
849 (4) The College of Law at Florida Agricultural and
850 Mechanical University shall develop and institute a program that
Page 34 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
851 is consistent with sound legal education principles as
852 determined by a the American Bar Association or any other
853 nationally recognized association for the accreditation of
854 colleges of law and that, to the extent consistent with such
855 sound legal education principles, is structured to serve the
856 legal needs of traditionally underserved portions of the
857 population by providing an opportunity for participation in a
858 legal clinic program or pro bono legal service.
859 (5) The Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University
860 Board of Trustees and the Board of Governors may accept grants,
861 donations, gifts, and moneys available for this purpose,
862 including moneys for planning and constructing the college. The
863 Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University Board of Trustees
864 may procure and accept any federal funds that are available for
865 the planning, creation, and establishment of the college of law.
866 If a the American Bar Association or any other nationally
867 recognized association for the accreditation of colleges of law
868 issues a third disapproval of an application for provisional
869 approval or for full approval or fails to grant, within 5 years
870 following the graduation of the first class, a provisional
871 approval, to the College of Law at Florida Agricultural and
872 Mechanical University, the Board of Governors shall make
873 recommendations to the Governor and Legislature as to whether
874 the college of law will cease operations at the end of the full
875 academic year subsequent to the receipt by the college of law of
Page 35 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
876 any such third disapproval, or whether the college of law will
877 continue operations and any conditions for continued operations.
878 If the college of law ceases operations of the college of law
879 pursuant to this section, the following conditions apply:
880 (a) The authority for the College of Law at Florida
881 Agricultural and Mechanical University and the authority of the
882 Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University Board of Trustees
883 and the Board of Governors provided in this section shall
884 terminate upon the cessation of operations of the College of Law
885 at Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University. The College
886 of Law at Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University shall
887 receive no moneys allocated for the planning, construction, or
888 operation of the college of law after its cessation of
889 operations other than moneys to be expended for the cessation of
890 operations of the college of law. Any moneys allocated to the
891 College of Law at Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University
892 not expended prior to or scheduled to be expended after the date
893 of the cessation of the college of law shall be appropriated for
894 other use by the Legislature of the State of Florida.
895 (b) Any buildings of the College of Law at Florida
896 Agricultural and Mechanical University constructed from the
897 expenditure of capital outlay funds appropriated by the
898 Legislature shall be owned by the Board of Trustees of the
899 Internal Improvement Trust Fund and managed by the Florida
900 Agricultural and Mechanical University Board of Trustees upon
Page 36 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
901 the cessation of the college of law.
902 Section 18. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
903 1005.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
904 1005.06 Institutions not under the jurisdiction or purview
905 of the commission.—
906 (1) Except as otherwise provided in law, the following
907 institutions are not under the jurisdiction or purview of the
908 commission and are not required to obtain licensure:
909 (b) Any college or, school, or course licensed or approved
910 as an institution for establishment and operation by another
911 state agency. A college or school, or any of its programs or
912 courses, does not qualify for exemption from the commission's
913 jurisdiction under this paragraph solely because another state
914 agency licenses or approves one or more of its programs or
915 courses. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit
916 or affect the exemptions for contract training, continuing
917 education, or professional development programs or courses under
918 paragraph (d), even if such programs or courses are approved
919 under chapter 466 for establishment and operation under part I
920 of chapter 464, chapter 466, or chapter 475, or any other
921 chapter of the Florida Statutes requiring licensing or approval
922 as defined in this chapter.
923 Section 19. Section 1006.12, Florida Statutes, is amended
924 to read:
925 1006.12 Safe-school officers at each public school.—For
Page 37 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
926 the protection and safety of school personnel, property,
927 students, and visitors, each district school board and school
928 district superintendent shall partner with law enforcement
929 agencies or security agencies to establish or assign one or more
930 safe-school officers at each school facility within the
931 district, including charter schools. A district school board
932 must collaborate with charter school governing boards to
933 facilitate charter school access to all safe-school officer
934 options available under this section. Notwithstanding any local
935 ordinance or development order, the school district or charter
936 school may implement any combination of the options in
937 subsections (1)-(4) to best meet the needs of the school
938 district and charter schools.
939 (1) SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER.—A school district may
940 establish school resource officer programs through a cooperative
941 agreement with law enforcement agencies.
942 (a) School resource officers shall undergo criminal
943 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation
944 and be certified law enforcement officers, as defined in s.
945 943.10(1), who are employed by a law enforcement agency as
946 defined in s. 943.10(4). The powers and duties of a law
947 enforcement officer shall continue throughout the employee's
948 tenure as a school resource officer.
949 (b) School resource officers shall abide by district
950 school board policies and shall consult with and coordinate
Page 38 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
951 activities through the school principal, but shall be
952 responsible to the law enforcement agency in all matters
953 relating to employment, subject to agreements between a district
954 school board and a law enforcement agency. The agreements shall
955 identify the entity responsible for maintaining records relating
956 to training. Activities conducted by the school resource officer
957 which are part of the regular instructional program of the
958 school shall be under the direction of the school principal.
959 (2) SCHOOL SAFETY OFFICER.—A school district may
960 commission one or more school safety officers for the protection
961 and safety of school personnel, property, and students within
962 the school district. The district school superintendent may
963 recommend, and the district school board may appoint, one or
964 more school safety officers.
965 (a) School safety officers shall undergo criminal
966 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation
967 and be law enforcement officers, as defined in s. 943.10(1),
968 certified under chapter 943 and employed by either a law
969 enforcement agency or by the district school board. If the
970 officer is employed by the district school board, the district
971 school board is the employing agency for purposes of chapter
972 943, and must comply with that chapter.
973 (b) A school safety officer has and shall exercise the
974 power to make arrests for violations of law on district school
975 board property or on property owned or leased by a charter
Page 39 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
976 school under a charter contract, as applicable, and to arrest
977 persons, whether on or off such property, who violate any law on
978 such property under the same conditions that deputy sheriffs are
979 authorized to make arrests. A school safety officer has the
980 authority to carry weapons when performing his or her official
981 duties.
982 (c) School safety officers must complete mental health
983 crisis intervention training using a curriculum developed by a
984 national organization with expertise in mental health crisis
985 intervention. The training shall improve officers' knowledge and
986 skills as first responders to incidents involving students with
987 emotional disturbance or mental illness, including de-escalation
988 skills to ensure student and officer safety.
989 (d) A district school board may enter into mutual aid
990 agreements with one or more law enforcement agencies as provided
991 in chapter 23. A school safety officer's salary may be paid
992 jointly by the district school board and the law enforcement
993 agency, as mutually agreed to.
994 (3) SCHOOL GUARDIAN.—
995 (a) At the school district's or the charter school
996 governing board's discretion, as applicable, pursuant to s.
997 30.15, a school district or charter school governing board may
998 participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach
999 Scott Beigel Guardian Program to meet the requirement of
1000 establishing a safe-school officer. The following individuals
Page 40 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1001 may serve as a school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned
1002 activities for purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory
1003 completion of the requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and
1004 certification by a sheriff:
1005 1. A school district employee or personnel, as defined
1006 under s. 1012.01, or a charter school employee, as provided
1007 under s. 1002.33(12)(a), who volunteers to serve as a school
1008 guardian in addition to his or her official job duties; or
1009 2. An employee of a school district or a charter school
1010 who is hired for the specific purpose of serving as a school
1011 guardian.
1012 (b) Before appointing an individual as a school guardian,
1013 the school district or charter school shall contact the
1014 Department of Law Enforcement and review all information
1015 maintained under s. 30.15(1)(k)3.c. related to the individual.
1016 (c) The department shall provide to the Department of Law
1017 Enforcement any information relating to a school guardian
1018 received pursuant to subsection (5).
1019 (4) SCHOOL SECURITY GUARD.—A school district or charter
1020 school governing board may contract with a security agency as
1021 defined in s. 493.6101(18) to employ as a school security guard
1022 an individual who holds a Class "D" and Class "G" license
1023 pursuant to chapter 493, provided the following training and
1024 contractual conditions are met:
1025 (a) An individual who serves as a school security guard,
Page 41 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1026 for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section,
1027 must:
1028 1. Demonstrate completion of 144 hours of required
1029 training conducted by a sheriff pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.
1030 2. Pass a psychological evaluation administered by a
1031 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the
1032 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the
1033 evaluation to the sheriff's office and school district, charter
1034 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
1035 applicable. The Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to
1036 provide the sheriff's office, school district, charter school
1037 governing board, or employing security agency with mental health
1038 and substance abuse data for compliance with this paragraph.
1039 3. Submit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent
1040 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s.
1041 112.0455 and the sheriff's office, school district, charter
1042 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
1043 applicable.
1044 4. Be approved to work as a school security guard by the
1045 sheriff of each county in which the school security guard will
1046 be assigned to a school before commencing work at any school in
1047 that county. The sheriff's approval authorizes the security
1048 agency to assign the school security guard to any school in the
1049 county, and the sheriff's approval is not limited to any
1050 particular school.
Page 42 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1051 5. Successfully complete ongoing training, weapon
1052 inspection, and firearm qualification conducted by a sheriff
1053 pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.e. on at least an annual basis and
1054 provide documentation to the sheriff's office, school district,
1055 charter school governing board, or employing security agency, as
1056 applicable.
1057 (b) The contract between a security agency and a school
1058 district or a charter school governing board regarding
1059 requirements applicable to school security guards serving in the
1060 capacity of a safe-school officer for purposes of satisfying the
1061 requirements of this section shall define the entity or entities
1062 responsible for maintaining records relating to training,
1063 inspection, and firearm qualification.
1064 (c) School security guards serving in the capacity of a
1065 safe-school officer pursuant to this subsection are in support
1066 of school-sanctioned activities for purposes of s. 790.115, and
1067 must aid in the prevention or abatement of active assailant
1068 incidents on school premises.
1069 (d) The Office of Safe Schools shall provide the
1070 Department of Law Enforcement any information related to a
1071 school security guard that the office receives pursuant to
1072 subsection (5).
1073 (5) NOTIFICATION.—The district school superintendent or
1074 charter school administrator, or a respective designee shall
1075 notify the county sheriff and the Office of Safe Schools
Page 43 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1076 immediately after, but no later than 72 hours after:
1077 (a) A safe-school officer is dismissed for misconduct or
1078 is otherwise disciplined.
1079 (b) A safe-school officer discharges his or her firearm in
1080 the exercise of the safe-school officer's duties, other than for
1081 training purposes.
1082 (6) CRISIS INTERVENTION TRAINING.—Each safe-school officer
1083 who is also a sworn law enforcement officer shall complete
1084 mental health crisis intervention training using a curriculum
1085 developed by a national organization with expertise in mental
1086 health crisis intervention. The training must improve the
1087 officer's knowledge and skills as a first responder to incidents
1088 involving students with emotional disturbance or mental illness,
1089 including de-escalation skills to ensure student and officer
1090 safety.
1091 (7) LIMITATIONS.—An individual must satisfy the background
1092 screening, psychological evaluation, and drug test requirements
1093 and be approved by the sheriff before participating in any
1094 training required by s. 30.15(1)(k), which may be conducted only
1095 by a sheriff.
1096 (8) EXEMPTION.—Any information that would identify whether
1097 a particular individual has been appointed as a safe-school
1098 officer pursuant to this section held by a law enforcement
1099 agency, school district, or charter school is exempt from s.
1100 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
Page 44 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1101
1102 If a district school board, through its adopted policies,
1103 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any
1104 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school
1105 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety
1106 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the
1107 charter school's share of the costs of the school resource
1108 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school
1109 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s.
1110 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district.
1111 Section 20. Paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of section
1112 1007.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1113 1007.25 General education courses; common prerequisites;
1114 other degree requirements.—
1115 (9)
1116 (b) An associate in arts specialized transfer degree must
1117 include 36 semester hours of general education coursework and
1118 require 60 semester hours or more of college credit. Specialized
1119 transfer degrees are designed for Florida College System
1120 institution students who need supplemental lower-level
1121 coursework in preparation for transfer to another institution.
1122 The State Board of Education shall establish criteria for the
1123 review and approval of new specialized transfer degrees. The
1124 approval process must require:
1125 1. A Florida College System institution to submit a notice
Page 45 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1126 of its intent to propose a new associate in arts specialized
1127 degree program to the Division of Florida Colleges. The notice
1128 must include the recommended credit hours, the rationale for the
1129 specialization, the demand for students entering the field, and
1130 the coursework being proposed to be included beyond the 60
1131 semester hours required for the general transfer degree, if
1132 applicable. Notices of intent may be submitted by a Florida
1133 College System institution at any time.
1134 2. The Division of Florida Colleges to forward the notice
1135 of intent within 10 business days after receipt to all Florida
1136 College System institutions and to the Chancellor of the State
1137 University System, who shall forward the notice to all state
1138 universities. State universities and Florida College System
1139 institutions shall have 30 60 days after receipt of the notice
1140 to submit comments to the proposed associate in arts specialized
1141 transfer degree.
1142 3. After the submission of comments pursuant to
1143 subparagraph 2., the requesting Florida College System
1144 institution to submit a proposal that, at a minimum, includes:
1145 a. Evidence that the coursework for the associate in arts
1146 specialized transfer degree includes demonstration of competency
1147 in a foreign language pursuant to s. 1007.262 and demonstration
1148 of civic literacy competency as provided in subsection (5).
1149 b. Demonstration that all required coursework will count
1150 toward the associate in arts degree or the baccalaureate degree.
Page 46 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1151 c. An analysis of demand and unmet need for students
1152 entering the specialized field of study at the baccalaureate
1153 level.
1154 d. Justification for the program length if it exceeds 60
1155 credit hours, including references to the common prerequisite
1156 manual or other requirements for the baccalaureate degree. This
1157 includes documentation of alignment between the exit
1158 requirements of a Florida College System institution and the
1159 admissions requirements of a baccalaureate program at a state
1160 university to which students would typically transfer.
1161 e. Articulation agreements for graduates of the associate
1162 in arts specialized transfer degree.
1163 f. Responses to the comments received under subparagraph
1164 2.
1165 Section 21. Subsections (1) and (16) of section 1007.271,
1166 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1167 1007.271 Dual enrollment programs.—
1168 (1) The dual enrollment program is the enrollment of an
1169 eligible secondary student in this state or home education
1170 student in this state in a postsecondary course creditable
1171 toward high school completion and a career certificate or an
1172 associate or baccalaureate degree. Postsecondary institutions
1173 that are eligible to participate in the dual enrollment program
1174 are Florida public postsecondary institutions and eligible not-
1175 for-profit independent colleges and universities pursuant to s.
Page 47 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1176 1011.62(1)(i). A student who is enrolled in postsecondary
1177 instruction that is not creditable toward a high school diploma
1178 may not be classified as a dual enrollment student.
1179 (16) Students who meet the eligibility requirements of
1180 this section and who choose to participate in dual enrollment
1181 programs are exempt from the payment of registration, tuition,
1182 and laboratory fees.
1183 Section 22. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1184 1008.2125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1185 1008.2125 The Council for Early Grade Success.—
1186 (1) The Council for Early Grade Success, a council as
1187 defined in s. 20.03(7), is created within the Department of
1188 Education to oversee the coordinated screening and progress
1189 monitoring program under s. 1008.25(9) for students in the
1190 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program through grade 3 and,
1191 except as otherwise provided in this section, shall operate
1192 consistent with s. 20.052.
1193 (a) The council shall be responsible for reviewing the
1194 implementation of, training for, and outcomes from the
1195 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program to provide
1196 recommendations to the department that support grade 3 students
1197 reading at or above grade level. The council, at a minimum,
1198 shall:
1199 1. Provide recommendations on the implementation of the
1200 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program, including
Page 48 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1201 reviewing any procurement solicitation documents and criteria
1202 before being published.
1203 2. Develop training plans and timelines for such training.
1204 3. Identify appropriate personnel, processes, and
1205 procedures required for the administration of the coordinated
1206 screening and progress monitoring program.
1207 4. Provide input on the methodology for calculating a
1208 provider's or school's performance metric and designations under
1209 s. 1002.68(3) s. 1002.68(4).
1210 5. Work with the department to review the methodology for
1211 determining a child's kindergarten readiness.
1212 6. Review data on age-appropriate learning gains by grade
1213 level that a student would need to attain in order to
1214 demonstrate proficiency in reading by grade 3.
1215 7. Continually review anonymized data from the results of
1216 the coordinated screening and progress monitoring program for
1217 students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
1218 through grade 3 to help inform recommendations to the department
1219 that support practices that will enable grade 3 students to read
1220 at or above grade level.
1221 Section 23. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4), paragraphs
1222 (b) and (d) of subsection (5), and paragraph (a) of subsection
1223 (9) of section 1008.25, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1224 1008.25 Public school student progression; student
1225 support; coordinated screening and progress monitoring;
Page 49 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1226 reporting requirements.—
1227 (4) ASSESSMENT AND SUPPORT.—
1228 (c) A student who has a substantial reading deficiency as
1229 determined in paragraph (5)(a) or a substantial mathematics
1230 deficiency as determined in paragraph (6)(a) must be covered by
1231 a federally required student plan, such as an individual
1232 education plan or an individualized progress monitoring plan, or
1233 both, as necessary. The individualized progress monitoring plan
1234 must be developed within 45 days after the results of the
1235 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system become
1236 available. The plan must, at a minimum, include:
1237 1. The student's specific, identified reading or
1238 mathematics skill deficiency.
1239 2. Goals and benchmarks for student growth in reading or
1240 mathematics.
1241 3. A description of the specific measures that will be
1242 used to evaluate and monitor the student's reading or
1243 mathematics progress.
1244 4. For a substantial reading deficiency, the specific
1245 evidence-based literacy instruction grounded in the science of
1246 reading which the student will receive.
1247 5. Strategies, resources, and materials that will be
1248 provided to the student's parent to support the student to make
1249 reading or mathematics progress. For a student with a
1250 substantial reading deficiency, resources must include
Page 50 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1251 information about the student's eligibility for the New Worlds
1252 Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485.
1253 6. Any additional services the student's teacher deems
1254 available and appropriate to accelerate the student's reading or
1255 mathematics skill development.
1256 (5) READING DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.—
1257 (b) A Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program student
1258 who exhibits a substantial deficiency in early literacy skills
1259 based upon the results of the administration of the midyear or
1260 final coordinated screening and progress monitoring under
1261 subsection (9) shall be referred to the local school district
1262 and may be eligible to receive instruction in early literacy
1263 skills before participating in kindergarten. A Voluntary
1264 Prekindergarten Education Program student who scores below the
1265 25th 10th percentile on the final administration of the
1266 coordinated screening and progress monitoring under subsection
1267 (9) shall be referred to the local school district and is
1268 eligible to receive early literacy skill instructional support
1269 through a summer bridge program the summer before participating
1270 in kindergarten. The summer bridge program must meet
1271 requirements adopted by the department and shall consist of 4
1272 hours of instruction per day for a minimum of 100 total hours. A
1273 student with an individual education plan who has been retained
1274 pursuant to paragraph (2)(g) and has demonstrated a substantial
1275 deficiency in early literacy skills must receive instruction in
Page 51 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1276 early literacy skills.
1277 (d) The parent of any student who exhibits a substantial
1278 deficiency in reading, as described in paragraph (a), must be
1279 immediately notified in writing of the following:
1280 1. That his or her child has been identified as having a
1281 substantial deficiency in reading, including a description and
1282 explanation, in terms understandable to the parent, of the exact
1283 nature of the student's difficulty in learning and lack of
1284 achievement in reading.
1285 2. A description of the current services that are provided
1286 to the child.
1287 3. A description of the proposed intensive interventions
1288 and supports that will be provided to the child that are
1289 designed to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency.
1290 4. The student progression requirements under paragraph
1291 (2)(h) and that if the child's reading deficiency is not
1292 remediated by the end of grade 3, the child must be retained
1293 unless he or she is exempt from mandatory retention for good
1294 cause.
1295 5. Strategies, including multisensory strategies and
1296 programming, through a read-at-home plan the parent can use in
1297 helping his or her child succeed in reading. The read-at-home
1298 plan must provide access to the resources identified in
1299 paragraph (e).
1300 6. That the statewide, standardized English Language Arts
Page 52 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1301 assessment is not the sole determiner of promotion and that
1302 additional evaluations, portfolio reviews, and assessments are
1303 available to the child to assist parents and the school district
1304 in knowing when a child is reading at or above grade level and
1305 ready for grade promotion.
1306 7. The district's specific criteria and policies for a
1307 portfolio as provided in subparagraph (7)(b)4. and the evidence
1308 required for a student to demonstrate mastery of Florida's
1309 academic standards for English Language Arts. A school must
1310 immediately begin collecting evidence for a portfolio when a
1311 student in grade 3 is identified as being at risk of retention
1312 or upon the request of the parent, whichever occurs first.
1313 8. The district's specific criteria and policies for
1314 midyear promotion. Midyear promotion means promotion of a
1315 retained student at any time during the year of retention once
1316 the student has demonstrated ability to read at grade level.
1317 9. Information about the student's eligibility for the New
1318 Worlds Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485 and the New Worlds
1319 Scholarship Accounts under s. 1002.411 and information on parent
1320 training modules and other reading engagement resources
1321 available through the initiative.
1322
1323 After initial notification, the school shall apprise the parent
1324 at least monthly of the student's progress in response to the
1325 intensive interventions and supports and the student's
Page 53 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1326 eligibility for the New Worlds Reading Initiative under s.
1327 1003.485. Such communications must be in writing and must
1328 explain any additional interventions or supports that will be
1329 implemented to accelerate the student's progress if the
1330 interventions and supports already being implemented have not
1331 resulted in improvement. Upon the request of the parent, the
1332 teacher or school administrator shall meet to discuss the
1333 student's progress. The parent may request more frequent
1334 notification of the student's progress, more frequent
1335 interventions or supports, and earlier implementation of the
1336 additional interventions or supports described in the initial
1337 notification.
1338 (9) COORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.—
1339 (a) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the
1340 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a
1341 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress
1342 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
1343 Program and public schools. The system must:
1344 1. Measure student progress in meeting the appropriate
1345 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in
1346 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by
1347 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational
1348 strengths and needs of students.
1349 2. For students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
1350 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral
Page 54 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1351 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness,
1352 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,
1353 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a
1354 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that
1355 measures equivalent levels of growth.
1356 3. Be a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate
1357 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and
1358 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress;
1359 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading
1360 or mathematics, including identifying students with
1361 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning
1362 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by
1363 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia
1364 shall undergo further screening. Beginning with the 2023-2024
1365 school year, the coordinated screening and progress monitoring
1366 system must be computer-adaptive.
1367 4. Provide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
1368 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68.
1369 5. Provide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
1370 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with
1371 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and
1372 parent communication.
1373 6. Provide baseline data to the department of each
1374 student's readiness for kindergarten. The determination of
1375 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each
Page 55 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1376 student's initial progress monitoring assessment in
1377 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a student's
1378 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department
1379 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s. 1002.68(3)
1380 s. 1002.68(4).
1381 7. Assess how well educational goals and curricular
1382 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state
1383 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the
1384 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for
1385 providers, districts, and schools.
1386 Section 24. Subsection (2) of section 1008.47, Florida
1387 Statutes, is amended to read:
1388 1008.47 Postsecondary education institution
1389 accreditation.—
1390 (2) ACCREDITATION.—
1391 (a) By September 1, 2022, The Board of Governors or the
1392 State Board of Education, as applicable, shall identify and
1393 determine the accrediting agencies or associations best suited
1394 to serve as an accreditor for public postsecondary institutions.
1395 Such accrediting agencies or associations must be recognized by
1396 the database created and maintained by the United States
1397 Department of Education. Within 3 years In the year following
1398 reaffirmation or fifth-year review by its accrediting agencies
1399 or associations, each public postsecondary institution must seek
1400 and obtain accreditation from an accrediting agency or
Page 56 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1401 association identified by the Board of Governors or State Board
1402 of Education, respectively, before its next reaffirmation or
1403 fifth-year review date. The requirements in this section are
1404 limited to a one-time change in accreditation. The requirements
1405 of this subsection are not applicable to those professional,
1406 graduate, departmental, or certificate programs at public
1407 postsecondary institutions that have specific accreditation
1408 requirements or best practices, including, but not limited to,
1409 law, pharmacy, engineering, or other similarly situated
1410 educational programs.
1411 (b) Once a public postsecondary institution is required to
1412 seek and obtain accreditation from an agency or association
1413 identified pursuant to paragraph (a), the institution shall seek
1414 accreditation from an a regional accrediting agency or
1415 association and provide quarterly reports of its progress to the
1416 Board of Governors or State Board of Education, as applicable.
1417 If each regional accreditation agency or association identified
1418 pursuant to paragraph (a) has refused to grant candidacy status
1419 to an institution, the institution must seek and obtain
1420 accreditation from any accrediting agency or association that is
1421 different from its current accrediting agency or association and
1422 is recognized by the database created and maintained by the
1423 United States Department of Education. If a public postsecondary
1424 institution is not granted candidacy status before its next
1425 reaffirmation or fifth-year review date, the institution may
Page 57 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1426 remain with its current accrediting agency or association.
1427 (c) This subsection expires December 31, 2032.
1428 Section 25. Subsection (7) of section 1009.21, Florida
1429 Statutes, is amended to read:
1430 1009.21 Determination of resident status for tuition
1431 purposes.—Students shall be classified as residents or
1432 nonresidents for the purpose of assessing tuition in
1433 postsecondary educational programs offered by charter technical
1434 career centers or career centers operated by school districts,
1435 in Florida College System institutions, and in state
1436 universities.
1437 (7) A person may shall not lose his or her resident status
1438 for tuition purposes solely by reason of his or her serving, or,
1439 if such person is a dependent child, by reason of his or her
1440 parent's or parents' serving outside this state as active duty
1441 or civilian personnel:,
1442 (a) In the Armed Forces outside this state.
1443 (b) On assignment for the United States Department of
1444 State or Department of Defense.
1445 (c) Teaching at a Department of Defense Dependent School.
1446 Section 26. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
1447 1009.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1448 1009.25 Fee exemptions.—
1449 (1) The following students are exempt from the payment of
1450 tuition and fees, including lab fees, at a school district that
Page 58 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1451 provides workforce education programs, Florida College System
1452 institution, or state university:
1453 (e) A student who meets the definition of homeless
1454 children and youths in s. 725 of the McKinney-Vento Homeless
1455 Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 11434a(2), as previously determined
1456 by a public school in this state. This includes a student who
1457 would otherwise meet the requirements of this paragraph, as
1458 determined by a college or university, but for his or her
1459 residence in college or university dormitory housing. The State
1460 Board of Education may adopt rules and the Board of Governors
1461 may adopt regulations regarding documentation and procedures to
1462 implement this paragraph. Such rules and regulations must
1463 consider documentation of a student's circumstance to be
1464 adequate if such documentation meets the standards under 20
1465 U.S.C. s. 1087uu-2(a). Any student who is determined to be a
1466 homeless child or youth for a preceding award year is presumed
1467 to be a homeless child or youth for each subsequent year unless
1468 the student informs the institution that the student's
1469 circumstances have changed or the institution has specific
1470 conflicting information about the student's independence, and
1471 has informed the student of this information. A distance
1472 learning student residing out-of-state is ineligible for the
1473 exemption in this paragraph.
1474 Section 27. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
1475 1009.893, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 59 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1476 1009.893 Benacquisto Scholarship Program.—
1477 (4) In order to be eligible for an initial award under the
1478 scholarship program, a student must meet the requirements of
1479 paragraph (a) or paragraph (b).
1480 (a) A student who is a resident of this state, as
1481 determined in s. 1009.40 and rules of the State Board of
1482 Education, must:
1483 1. Earn a standard Florida high school diploma or its
1484 equivalent pursuant to s. 1002.3105, s. 1003.4281, s. 1003.4282,
1485 or s. 1003.435 unless:
1486 a. The student completes a home education program
1487 according to s. 1002.41; or
1488 b. The student earns a high school diploma from a non-
1489 Florida school while living with a parent who is on military or
1490 public service assignment out of this state;
1491 2. Be accepted by and enroll in a Florida public or
1492 independent postsecondary educational institution that is
1493 regionally accredited; and
1494 3. Be enrolled full-time in a baccalaureate degree program
1495 at an eligible regionally accredited Florida public or
1496 independent postsecondary educational institution during the
1497 fall academic term following high school graduation. A student
1498 may defer the initial scholarship award for up to 1 year.
1499 Section 28. Subsection (5) of section 1009.983, Florida
1500 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 60 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1501 1009.983 Direct-support organization; authority.—
1502 (5) The chair of the board or a designee who possesses
1503 knowledge, skill, and experience in the areas of accounting,
1504 risk management, or investment management shall serve as a
1505 director of the direct-support organization. The chair and the
1506 executive director of the board shall jointly name, at a
1507 minimum, four other individuals to serve as directors of the
1508 organization.
1509 Section 29. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
1510 1009.986, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1511 1009.986 Florida ABLE program.—
1512 (3) DIRECT-SUPPORT ORGANIZATION; FLORIDA ABLE, INC.—
1513 (d)1. The board of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc., shall
1514 consist of:
1515 a. The chair of the Florida Prepaid College Board, or a
1516 his or her designee who possesses knowledge, skill, and
1517 experience in the areas of accounting, risk management, or
1518 investment management.
1519 b. Up to three individuals who possess knowledge, skill,
1520 and experience in the areas of accounting, risk management, or
1521 investment management, one of whom may be a current member of
1522 the Florida Prepaid College Board, who shall be appointed by the
1523 Florida Prepaid College Board.
1524 c. One individual who possesses knowledge, skill, and
1525 experience in the areas of accounting, risk management, or
Page 61 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1526 investment management, who shall be appointed by the Governor.
1527 d. Two individuals who are advocates of persons with
1528 disabilities, one of whom shall be appointed by the President of
1529 the Senate and one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of
1530 the House of Representatives. At least one of the individuals
1531 appointed under this sub-subparagraph must be an advocate of
1532 persons with developmental disabilities, as that term is defined
1533 in s. 393.063.
1534 2.a. The term of the appointees under sub-subparagraph
1535 1.b. shall be up to 3 years as determined by the Florida Prepaid
1536 College Board. Such appointees may be reappointed.
1537 b. The term of the appointees under sub-subparagraphs 1.c.
1538 and d. shall be 3 years. Such appointees may be reappointed.
1539 3. Unless authorized by the board of directors of Florida
1540 ABLE, Inc., an individual director has no authority to control
1541 or direct the operations of Florida ABLE, Inc., or the actions
1542 of its officers and employees.
1543 4. The board of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc.:
1544 a. Shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon
1545 the call of the chair.
1546 b. May use any method of telecommunications to conduct, or
1547 establish a quorum at, its meetings or the meetings of a
1548 subcommittee or other subdivision if the public is given proper
1549 notice of the telecommunications meeting and provided reasonable
1550 access to observe and, if appropriate, to participate.
Page 62 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1551 c. Shall annually elect a board member to serve as chair.
1552 5. A majority of the total current membership of the board
1553 of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc., constitutes a quorum of the
1554 board.
1555 6. Members of the board of directors of Florida ABLE,
1556 Inc., and the board's subcommittees or other subdivisions shall
1557 serve without compensation; however, the members may be
1558 reimbursed for reasonable, necessary, and actual travel expenses
1559 pursuant to s. 112.061.
1560 Section 30. Present paragraphs (h) and (i) of subsection
1561 (17) of section 1011.62, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
1562 paragraphs (i) and (j), respectively, and a new paragraph (h) is
1563 added to that subsection, to read:
1564 1011.62 Funds for operation of schools.—If the annual
1565 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each
1566 district for operation of schools is not determined in the
1567 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing
1568 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as
1569 follows:
1570 (17) ACADEMIC ACCELERATION OPTIONS SUPPLEMENT.—The
1571 academic acceleration options supplement is created to assist
1572 school districts in providing academic acceleration options,
1573 career-themed courses, and courses that lead to digital tool
1574 certificates and industry certifications for prekindergarten
1575 through grade 12 students and shall be allocated annually in the
Page 63 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1576 General Appropriations Act.
1577 (h) Calculation of additional full-time equivalent
1578 membership based on Florida advanced courses and tests scores of
1579 students.—A value of 0.16 full-time equivalent student
1580 membership shall be calculated for each student in a Florida
1581 advanced course who achieves a minimum score on an assessment
1582 identified by the Department of Education pursuant to s.
1583 1007.27(2) and added to the total full-time equivalent student
1584 membership in basic programs for grades 9 through 12 in the
1585 subsequent fiscal year. Each district shall allocate at least 80
1586 percent of the funds provided to the district for advanced
1587 course instruction, in accordance with this paragraph, to the
1588 high school that generates the funds. The school district shall
1589 distribute to each classroom teacher who provided the advanced
1590 course instruction:
1591 1. A bonus in the amount of $50 for each student taught by
1592 the Florida advanced course teacher in each Florida advanced
1593 course who achieves a minimum score on an assessment identified
1594 by the Department of Education pursuant to s. 1007.27(2).
1595 2. An additional bonus of $500 to each Florida advanced
1596 course teacher in a school designated with a grade of "D" or "F"
1597 who has at least one student who achieves a minimum score on an
1598 assessment identified by the Department of Education pursuant to
1599 s. 1007.27(2), regardless of the number of classes taught or of
1600 the number of students who achieve a minimum score on an
Page 64 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1601 assessment identified by the Department of Education pursuant to
1602 s. 1007.27(2).
1603 Section 31. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
1604 1011.69, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1605 1011.69 Equity in School-Level Funding Act.—
1606 (4) After providing Title I, Part A, Basic funds to
1607 schools above the 75 percent poverty threshold, which may
1608 include high schools above the 50 percent threshold as permitted
1609 by federal law, school districts shall provide any remaining
1610 Title I, Part A, Basic funds directly to all eligible schools as
1611 provided in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, an
1612 eligible school is a school that is eligible to receive Title I
1613 funds, including a charter school. The threshold for identifying
1614 eligible schools may not exceed the threshold established by a
1615 school district for the 2016-2017 school year or the statewide
1616 percentage of economically disadvantaged students, as determined
1617 annually.
1618 (a) Prior to the allocation of Title I funds to eligible
1619 schools, a school district may withhold funds only as follows:
1620 1. One percent for parent involvement, in addition to the
1621 one percent the district must reserve under federal law for
1622 allocations to eligible schools for parent involvement;
1623 2. A necessary and reasonable amount for administration
1624 which includes the district's indirect cost rate, not to exceed
1625 a total of 10 percent;
Page 65 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1279, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1626 3. A reasonable and necessary amount to provide:
1627 a. Homeless programs;
1628 b. Delinquent and neglected programs;
1629 c. Prekindergarten programs and activities;
1630 d. Private school equitable services; and
1631 e. Transportation for foster care children to their school
1632 of origin or choice programs; and
1633 4. A necessary and reasonable amount, not to exceed 1
1634 percent, for eligible schools to provide educational services in
1635 accordance with the approved Title I plan. Such educational
1636 services may include the provision of STEM curricula,
1637 instructional materials, and related learning technologies that
1638 support academic achievement in science, technology,
1639 engineering, and mathematics in Title I schools, including, but
1640 not limited to, technologies related to drones, coding,
1641 animation, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, data science,
1642 the engineering design process, mobile development, and
1643 robotics. Funds may be reserved under this subparagraph only to
1644 the extent that all required reservations under federal law have
1645 been met and that such reservation does not reduce school-level
1646 allocations below the levels required under federal law.
1647 Section 32. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 66 of 66
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1279 -03-er